Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 1. Bird and Animal Provisions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state wildlife possession laws, 50 ALR5th 703.

§ 23-3-101.
Taking eagle prohibited.

Any person who takes an eagle is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii) unless the taking is authorized by federal law or commission rules adopted in compliance with federal law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-54; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2013 ch. 110, § 1, effective February 28, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “2nd degree misdemeanor.”

The 2013 amendment,

added “unless the taking is authorized by federal law or commission rules adopted in compliance with federal law” following “ W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).”

Laws 2013, ch. 110, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 27, 2013.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
175.14 (Matthew Bender).

§ 23-3-102.
Taking certain game animals without license or during a closed season prohibited.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, any person who takes any big or trophy game animal or gray wolf where classified as a trophy game animal without the proper license or authority is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). The taking of each animal is a separate offense.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 62, § 2.

Any person who knowingly takes any antlered elk, antlered deer, antlered moose, horned antelope, bighorn sheep, mountain goat, mountain lion, grizzly bear or black bear without the proper license or during a closed season except as otherwise permitted by this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both. A third or subsequent conviction within ten (10) years for a violation of this subsection shall constitute a felony punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. For the purposes of determining whether a violation of this subsection is a felony, convictions resulting from the same occurrence shall be considered a single conviction even if the result of the occurrence is more than one (1) misdemeanor conviction. The provisions of W.S. 6-8-101(a) shall not apply to convictions under this section.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-55; Laws 1993, ch. 186, § 1; 1995, ch. 69, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2007, ch. 62, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 187, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to forfeiture of devices and equipment used in taking game illegally, see
§

23-6-208

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote (a), adding the exception at the beginning, inserting classification for big trophy game animals, and revising the degree of punishment; repealed (b), which read: b‚Any person who takes any bighorn sheep, mountain goat, mountain lion, grizzly bear or, gray wolf where classified as a trophy game animal, without the proper license except as otherwise permitted by this act is guilty of a 4th degree misdemeanor”; and repealed (c), which read: “Any person who takes any big or trophy game animals not specified in subsection (a) and (b) without a proper license except as otherwise permitted by this act is guilty of an 8th degree misdemeanor.”.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), added the last three sentences.

Indians subject to prosecution. —

Defendant Indian and his tribe did not have an unrestricted right to hunt and fish on national forest lands within this state as reserved in the Treaty with the Crows. Thus, defendant was subject to prosecution under this section for killing an elk in the park. Crow Tribe of Indians v. Repsis, 866 F. Supp. 520, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15355 (D. Wyo. 1994), aff'd, 73 F.3d 982, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 36612 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
14 (Matthew Bender).

§ 23-3-103.
Taking predatory animals, predacious birds and trophy animals; taking furbearing animals and game birds without license prohibited.

Predatory animals and predacious birds may be taken without a license in any manner and at any time except as provided by W.S. 23-2-303(d) and (e),

23-3-112

, 23-3-304(b),

23-3-305

and

23-3-307

. The department shall report annually to the Wyoming department of agriculture the number of predatory animals and predacious birds taken by the department’s animal damage control agents, and include in the report the area where taken and the control method used.

In areas designated by the commission under W.S. 23-1-302(a)(ii), specified trophy game animals may be taken in the same manner as predatory animals without a license.

Any person who takes any furbearing animal or game bird without the appropriate license, except as otherwise provided by this act is guilty of a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-56; Laws 1977, ch. 112, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 27, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “9th degree misdemeanor” in (c).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and (e)” in (a).

Editor's notes.—

Laws 2009, ch. 27, § 2 provides: “The commission shall adopt final rules to implement this act not later than July 1, 2009.”

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
175.14 (Matthew Bender).

§ 23-3-104.
Coupons.

When any big game animal, trophy game animal or turkey is killed under a license, the licensee shall detach, sign and date the proper coupon and attach the coupon to the carcass before leaving the site of the kill. The coupon shall remain on the game animal or turkey carcass at all times until the meat undergoes processing, or on the trophy game animal hide until it reaches the hunter’s home or a taxidermist, except that during transportation of the carcass or hide the coupon may be removed to prevent its loss. If the coupon is removed for transportation of the carcass or hide it must be in the possession of the person accompanying the carcass or hide at all times.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 85; C.S. 1945, § 47-524; Laws 1949, ch. 89, § 2; 1951, ch. 76, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-90; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-57; Laws 1979, ch. 128, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to limitation on number of big or trophy game animal licenses, see §

23-1-703

.

§ 23-3-105.
Antelope, deer and elk coupons; payment to landowner; kill on federal or state land.

Antelope, deer and elk licenses shall have two (2) coupons attached, each bearing the same serial number as the body of the permit, one (1) designated “antelope, deer or elk coupon” and one (1) designated “landowner’s coupon”.

The landowner’s coupon shall promptly be detached, dated, signed and delivered to the landowner. The landowner, on or before March 1 following the close of the hunting season for which the license was issued, shall deliver to the department the coupon and an affidavit that the antelope, deer or elk for which the coupon was delivered was killed on his land. Upon receipt of the coupon and affidavit the department shall pay the landowner sixteen dollars ($16.00) for each coupon from an antelope, deer or elk license. Landowner’s coupons are not transferable. Any unauthorized person attempting to collect any sum for any landowner’s coupon is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). Effective January 1, 2000, the department shall provide a checkoff box on each landowner coupon affidavit claim form that offers the claimant the opportunity to designate the animal damage management board to receive his payment amount for landowner coupons claimed on that form. For each claim made where the landowner has designated his payment to the animal damage management board, the department shall transfer that amount to the animal damage management account created by W.S.

11-6-306

and the department shall retain the fees related to those administrative costs of the transfer.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 33, § 1.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, §§ 66, 67; 1943, ch. 50, § 1; 1945, ch. 156, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 47-419, 47-420; W.S. 1957, §§ 23-82, 23-83; Laws 1971, ch. 64, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-58; Laws 1979, ch. 128, § 1; 1991, ch. 254, § 1; 1996, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 197, § 2; 2003, ch. 112, § 1; ch. 144, § 1; 2007, ch. 2, § 1; ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 119, § 1; 2013 ch. 33, § 1, effective February 14, 2013; 2018 ch. 89, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “second degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 2, § 1, effective January 1, 2008, substituted “sixteen dollars ($16.00)” for “thirteen dollars ($13.00)” in (b).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the second sentence of (b), inserted comma after “landowner” and substituted “March” for “February” and “issued” for “valid.”

The 2013 amendment,

repealed former (c), which read: “When an antelope, deer or elk is shown to have been killed on federal or state land, the licensee shall detach, date, and sign the landowner's coupon and mail or otherwise deliver the coupon to the Cheyenne office of the department.”

Laws 2013, ch. 33, section 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, section 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019, in (b),
substituted “following the close of the hunting season for
which” for “following the year for which” in
the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 89, § 2, provides: “Licenses issued under title 23 of the Wyoming statutes before January 1, 2019, shall expire in accordance with the applicable provisions of law existing prior to amendment by this act.”

§ 23-3-106.
Wyoming game and Wyoming interstate game tags; when required.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section and W.S. 23-2-302(e), no person shall ship, transport, or receive for shipment or transportation within Wyoming, any game animal, game bird, or any part thereof, unless tagged with a Wyoming game tag or Wyoming interstate game tag, or unless:

The transportation is by a person accompanying the carcass of a big or trophy game animal who is in possession of a proper coupon;

The transportation is by a properly licensed bird or small game hunter in possession of not more than his daily bag or possession limit; or

The transportation is by a person possessing authorization pursuant to W.S.

23-3-310

.

Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section and W.S. 23-2-302(e), no big or trophy game animal, or any part thereof, shall be shipped or transported from the state unless accompanied by the licensee who harvested the animal, in possession of a proper coupon, or unless:

The amount does not exceed twenty-five (25) pounds and is properly tagged with a Wyoming interstate game tag. Only twenty-five (25) pounds from any one (1) big or trophy game animal may be exported from the state except as otherwise provided;

The part to be exported from the state is of a nonedible trophy or hidelike nature and properly tagged with a Wyoming interstate game tag;

The big or trophy game animal was legally harvested by a nonresident and is tagged with a Wyoming interstate tag.

Tag selling agents may tag meat from any number of big game animals if the person lawfully accompanying the animals signs an affidavit that each animal was lawfully taken.

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

Shipment or receipt from a meat processing plant to another meat processing plant of any edible portions of big game animals or game birds are exempt from the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section. Meat processing plants shipping any game animal, game bird or any part thereof to the licensee who harvested the animal are exempt from the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section when the shipment is accompanied by the proper coupon.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 70; C.S. 1945, § 47-501; Laws 1947, ch. 88, § 1; 1955, ch. 29, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-91; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-59; Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 2; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2014 ch. 42, § 1, effective March 7, 2014; 2015 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 88, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (e).

The 2014 amendment

, at the beginning of the sentence in both (a) and (b), inserted “Except as provided in W.S. 23-2-302(e).”

Laws 2014, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 7, 2014.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “subsection (f) of this section and” in (a) and (b); and added (f).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Transportation of big or trophy game animal"; deleted "or" at the end of (a)(i); added "or" at the end of (a)(ii); and added (a)(iii).

§ 23-3-107.
Wanton destruction of big game animal; reward.

No person shall wantonly take or destroy any big or trophy game animal.

The director may offer a standing reward not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) to be paid from the game and fish fund for evidence leading to the arrest and conviction of any person violating this section.

The purpose and intent of this section is to protect big or trophy game animals from wanton, ruthless or needless destruction.

Violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). A third or subsequent conviction within ten (10) years for a violation of this section shall constitute a felony punishable by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. For the purposes of determining whether a violation of this subsection is a felony, convictions resulting from the same occurrence shall be considered a single conviction even if the result of the occurrence is more than one (1) misdemeanor conviction. The provisions of W.S. 6-8-101(a) shall not apply to convictions under this section.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 76; R.S. 1931, § 49-178; C.S. 1945, § 47-511; W.S. 1957, § 23-93; Laws 1971, ch. 24, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-60; Laws 1993, ch. 186, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2011, ch. 187, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to forfeiture of devices and equipment used in taking game illegally, see
§

23-6-208

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “1st degree misdemeanor” in (d).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (d), added the last three sentences.

Stated

in

State v. Steele, 620 P.2d 1026,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 23-3-108.
Destruction of bird nests or eggs.

No person shall take or intentionally destroy the nest or eggs of any nonpredacious bird, except as authorized under W.S.

23-5-111

. The nest or eggs of any predacious bird may be taken or destroyed.

Violation of this section for any nonpredacious bird except eagle constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

Violation of this section in regard to eagle nests or eggs constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 75; C.S. 1945, § 47-513; W.S. 1957, § 23-95; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-61; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2017 ch. 213, § 2, effective March 17, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (b); and substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “2nd degree misdemeanor” in (c).

The 2017 amendment,

in (a) added “except as authorized under
W.S.

23-5-111

,” and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 213, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2017.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, (2d Ed.) §
14 (Matthew Bender).

§ 23-3-109.
Use of dogs; dogs injuring big or trophy game animals may be killed; citation of owners of dogs harassing game animals; penalties; leashed dogs for tracking.

No person shall use any dog to hunt, run or harass any big or trophy game animal, protected animal or furbearing animal except as otherwise provided by this act. The commission shall regulate the use of dogs to take mountain lions and bobcats by residents and nonresidents during hunting or trapping seasons.

In cases where big game animals have been injured or are being threatened with immediate injury by dogs, a peace officer may kill such dog or dogs where the vicious character of the dog or dogs is manifest. A peace officer killing a dog pursuant to this subsection shall make reasonable efforts to ascertain the ownership of the dog and inform the owner of the dog’s death and the circumstances surrounding the death. Any peace officer who kills a dog pursuant to this subsection or has received a report that a dog has been killed shall file a report with his employing agency within twenty-four (24) hours of his action or of receiving a report.

It is unlawful for any person to recklessly allow or direct a dog which he owns or is under his control to injure or threaten a big game animal with injury, whether or not the big game animal is actually injured by the dog, unless the dog was attempting to protect livestock or other property. A conviction under this subsection is punishable by a fine imposed for a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

A person may use one (1) leashed blood-trailing dog to track a wounded or killed big game animal within seventy-two (72) hours of shooting the animal. A person using a dog in this manner:

Shall maintain physical control of the dog at all times by means of a maximum fifty (50) foot leash attached to the collar or harness of the dog;

Shall wear fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink consistent with W.S. 23-3-113(a);

May kill the wounded animal using any weapon authorized under the hunting license;

Shall, in accordance with W.S.

23-3-104

, attach the proper coupon to the carcass of any animal killed under the hunting license.

A person acting solely as a dog handler accompanying the licensed hunter that wounded the game animal is exempt from the licensing requirements of this act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a dog handler to hunt without a license.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 76; C.S. 1945, § 47-514; W.S. 1957, § 23-96; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-62; Laws 1993, ch. 100, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 41, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 148, § 1; 2017 ch. 149, § 1, effective March 6, 2017; 2019 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (c), deleted “has been trained, and” following “unless the dog,” substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor,” substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “10th degree misdemeanor,” and made a related change.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c), rewrote the first sentence, which read: “A peace officer may arrest or issue a summons to the owner of any dog injuring or threatening a big game animal with immediate injury, unless the dog was attempting to protect livestock.”, deleted “first” preceding “conviction in the second sentence, and deleted the former third sentence, which read: “A second and each subsequent conviction under this subsection is punishable by a fine and imprisonment imposed for a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23 6 202(a)(v).”

The 2017 amendment,

in the last sentence of (a), inserted “by residents and nonresidents.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d) and (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§

23-1-102

(a)(xiii).

§ 23-3-110.
Firearms; types permitted for hunting game birds.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation firearm and ammunition specifications for taking game birds or wild turkeys.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 54, § 2.

Violation of this section or rules promulgated under this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 89; C.S. 1945, § 47-528; Laws 1949, ch. 89, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 23-100; Laws 1967, ch. 60, § 1; 1969, ch. 122, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-63; Laws 2001, ch. 62, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2012, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “10th degree misdemeanor” in (c).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, rewrote (a) which formerly read: “Except as otherwise provided, game birds excluding ruffed and blue grouse may only be taken with a shotgun not larger than ten (10) gauge. Automatic loading, pump, or repeating shotguns must be plugged to admit no more than one (1) shell in the chamber and two (2) shells in the magazine”; repealed former (b) which read: “Firearms using center-fire cartridges, muzzle-loading arms or firearms of twenty-two (.22) magnum caliber may be used to take wild turkeys”; and inserted “or rules promulgated under this section” in (c).

§ 23-3-111.
Firearms; size of guns to be used in hunting big or trophy game animals.

The commission shall establish by rule and regulation firearm and ammunition specifications for taking big or trophy game animals.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 54, § 2.

Violation of this section or rules promulgated under this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 90; 1925, ch. 137, § 30; R.S. 1931, § 49-192; Laws 1933, ch. 39, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 47-529; W.S. 1957, § 23-101; Laws 1965, ch. 52, § 1; ch. 184, § 6; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-64; Laws 1979, ch. 77, § 1; 1995, ch. 188, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2012, ch. 54, §§ 1, 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “low misdemeanor punishable as provided in
W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “10th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, rewrote (a) which formerly read: “Except as otherwise provided, big or trophy game animals may only be taken with the following types of firearms”; repealed former (a)(i) and (a)(ii) pertaining to firearms and barrel size; and inserted “or rules promulgated under this section” in (b).

§ 23-3-112.
Firearms; automatic weapon prohibited; use of silencer or suppressor to take big or trophy game restricted; penalties.

No person shall take any wildlife with any fully automatic weapon.

Violation of this section is separate and additional to any other violation and constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

No person shall use a device designed to silence or muffle the report of any firearm in the commission of:

A violation of W.S.

23-3-102

;

A violation of W.S.

23-3-107

;

A violation of W.S. 23-3-305(b) which results in the taking of a big or trophy game animal; or

Taking of a big or trophy game animal out of season.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 97; R.S. 1931, § 49-199; Laws 1933, ch. 39, § 17; C.S. 1945, § 47-530; W.S. 1957, § 23-102; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-65; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2013 ch. 65, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “1st degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) substituted “any wildlife with” for “into or possess in the game fields or forests of Wyoming,” and deleted “or device designed to silence or muffle the report of any firearm”; in (b) added “is separate and additional to any other violation and”; and added (c).

§ 23-3-113.
Hunters required to wear colored clothing.

No person other than archers and crossbow hunters hunting during a special archery season shall hunt any big or trophy game animal in Wyoming without wearing in a visible manner one (1) or more exterior garments which shall include a hat, shirt, jacket, coat, vest, or sweater of a fluorescent orange or fluorescent pink color.

Violation of this section constitutes a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v).

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 83, § 75; R.S. 1931, § 49-177; C.S. 1945, § 47-535; W.S. 1957, § 23-105; Laws 1967, ch. 10, § 1; 1969, ch. 121, § 2; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-66; 2007, ch. 62, § 1; 2018 ch. 105, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a low misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(v)” for “an 11th degree misdemeanor” in (b).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), inserted “or fluorescent pink” following “fluorescent orange.”

Cited

in

Mayland v. State, 568 P.2d 897,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 23-3-114.
Landowner may take beaver causing damage.

Any beaver flooding meadows, damming irrigation systems or constructing dams or ponds which would be dangerous to livestock on any privately owned lands or on state lands, may be immediately taken by the landowner, lessee of state lands or employee of the landowner or lessee or an agent of the landowner or lessee.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 46; C.S. 1945, § 47-302; Laws 1957, ch. 178, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-118; Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-67; Laws 1987, ch. 156, § 1.

§ 23-3-115.
Taking black bear, mountain lion, gray wolf, bobcat, weasel, badger, squirrels or muskrat for damaging property.

Any black bear, mountain lion, bobcat, weasel, badger, gray, red and fox squirrels or muskrat doing damage to private property may be immediately taken and killed by the owner of the property, employee of the owner or lessee of the property.

The owner, employee or lessee shall immediately notify the nearest game warden of the killing of black bear, bobcat or mountain lion. The owner, employee or lessee shall save and care for the skin and procure a Wyoming game tag for the skin of black bear, mountain lion or bobcat.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section relating to the taking of animals doing damage to private property shall apply to gray wolves from and after the date gray wolves are removed from the list of experimental nonessential population, endangered species or threatened species in Wyoming as provided by W.S.

23-1-108

. For purposes of this section as it applies to gray wolves, “doing damage to private property” means actual biting, wounding, grasping or killing of livestock or a dog, or chasing, molesting or harassing of livestock or a dog by a wolf that would indicate to a reasonable person that actual biting, wounding, grasping or killing of the livestock or dog is likely to occur at any moment. The owner, employee or lessee acting under authority of this section shall notify the department of the killing of a gray wolf within an area of the state in which the gray wolf is designated as a trophy game animal. The notification shall be made within seventy-two (72) hours of the kill.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 71; C.S. 1945, § 47-502; W.S. 1957, § 23-119; Laws 1959, ch. 196, § 4; 1969, ch. 129, § 10; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-68; Laws 1979, ch. 140, § 1; 1991, ch. 103, § 1; 1998, ch. 107, § 1; 2003, ch. 115, § 2; 2007, ch. 168, § 3; 2012, ch. 25, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

updated the internal reference in the third sentence of (c).

The 2012 amendment,

in (c), added the present second sentence, substituted “designated” for “classified” after “the gray wolf is,” and changed the notification deadline for all gray wolf kills to within 72 hours.

Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, provides: “This act shall be effective only if W.S.

23-1-109

as created by this act is in effect in accordance with the provisions of that section. The legislative service office is authorized and directed to publish the provisions of this act in the manner which most effectively displays the contingencies provided in this act.”

Subsection (c) of this section was amended by 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168, which provided the act was effective on and after July 1, 2007 only upon certification by the Governor to the Secretary of State of the occurrence of specified acts.
On February 27, 2008, in accordance with W.S. 23-1-109(f), the Governor filed with the Secretary of State his certification that all act necessary for House Enrolled Act 123 (2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168) to become effective
had occurred. 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 25, Section 3, provided that legislature
found that the contingencies required by 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 168,
occurred and that the provisions became effective.
2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 25, further amended subsection (c) of this section.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming Land and the Law One Hundred Years After Statehood — A Perspective,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1991).

§ 23-3-116.
Ownership of game bird; taking of privately owned game birds.

Any person who wishes to acquire game birds from any private source shall apply for and receive a permit from the department prior to acquiring, possessing or transporting the game birds. Upon receipt of the game birds, the permittee shall notify the department to establish proof of ownership and to allow the game birds to be marked with a leg or wing band. Whenever game birds are purchased outside the state, the permittee shall furnish adequate evidence that the game birds are disease free. Upon compliance with this section, the permittee is entitled to take his privately owned game birds without a game bird or turkey license. Live greater sage grouse or the eggs thereof shall only be acquired, possessed, bred, propagated, raised, sold, transported, taken and released by a game bird farm licensee holding a current certification under W.S.

23-5-111

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 249, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23.1-69; 2017 ch. 213, § 2, effective March 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

added the last sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 213, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2017.

§ 23-3-117.
Bighorn sheep; registration of horns; penalties.

A licensee who harvests a bighorn sheep or any person who picks up or removes horns from any bighorn sheep, after July 1, 1997, shall present the horns at a regional office of the department during normal business hours to be registered in accordance with department rules and regulations. The horns shall be presented pursuant to this section within fifteen (15) days after taking the horns into possession. The department may require substantive proof from unlicensed individuals that the horns were legally acquired. Failure to provide such proof may result in confiscation of the horns. A violation of this section constitutes a high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 138, § 1; 2007, ch. 62, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “high misdemeanor punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii)” for “3rd degree misdemeanor as provided by W.S. 23-6-202(a)(iii).”